Utah statutes.
62A-15-602.   Definitions.
As used in this part, Part 7, Commitment of Persons Under Age 18 to Division
of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, Part 8, Interstate Compact on Mental
Health, Part 9, Utah Forensic Mental Health Facility, and Part 10, Declaration
for Mental Health Treatment:
(1)  "Adult" means a person 18 years of age or older.
(2)  "Commitment to the custody of a local mental health authority" means that
an adult is committed to the custody of the local mental health authority that
governs the mental health catchment area in which the proposed patient resides
or is found.
(3)  "Designated examiner" means a licensed physician familiar with severe
mental illness, preferably a psychiatrist, designated by the division as
specially qualified by training or experience in the diagnosis of mental or
related illness or another licensed mental health professional designated by
the division as specially qualified by training and at least five years'
continual experience in the treatment of mental or related illness.  At least
one designated examiner in any case shall be a licensed physician.  No person
who is the applicant, or who signs the certification, under Section 62A-15-631
may be a designated examiner in the same case.
(4)  "Designee" means a physician who has responsibility for medical functions
including admission and discharge, an employee of a local mental health
authority, or an employee of an agency that has contracted with a local mental
health authority to provide mental health services under Section 17-43-304.
(5)  "Institution" means a hospital, or a health facility licensed under the
provisions of Section 26-21-9.
(6)  "Licensed physician" means an individual licensed under the laws of this
state to practice medicine, or a medical officer of the United States
government while in this state in the performance of official duties.
(7)  "Local comprehensive community mental health center" means an agency or
organization that provides treatment and services to residents of a designated
geographic area, operated by or under contract with a local mental health
authority, in compliance with state standards for local comprehensive
community mental health centers.
(8)  "Mental illness" means a psychiatric disorder as defined by the current
edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published
by the American Psychiatric Association which substantially impairs a person's
mental, emotional, behavioral, or related functioning.
(9)  "Mental health facility" means the Utah State Hospital or other facility
that provides mental health services under contract with the division, a local
mental health authority, or organization that contracts with a local mental
health authority.
(10)  "Mental health officer" means an individual who is designated by a local
mental health authority as qualified by training and experience in the
recognition and identification of mental illness, to interact with and
transport persons to any mental health facility.
(11)  "Patient" means an individual under commitment to the custody or to the
treatment services of a local mental health authority.
(12)  "Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves a substantial
risk of death, unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious
disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily
member, organ, or mental faculty.
(13)  "Substantial danger" means the person, by his or her behavior, due to
mental illness:
(a)  is at serious risk to:
(i)  commit suicide,
(ii)  inflict serious bodily injury on himself or herself; or
(iii)  because of his or her actions or inaction, suffer serious bodily injury
because he or she is incapable of providing the basic necessities of life,
such as food, clothing, and shelter;
(b)  is at serious risk to cause or attempt to cause serious bodily injury; or
(c)  has inflicted or attempted to inflict serious bodily injury on another.
(14)  "Treatment" means psychotherapy, medication, including the
administration of psychotropic medication, and other medical treatments that
are generally accepted medical and psychosocial interventions for the purpose
of restoring the patient to an optimal level of functioning in the least
restrictive environment.
